src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-PstAct-deverbals_gt-norm.yaml
    выпороть²+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выпоровший
    выпороть²+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выпоровший
    выпороть¹+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выпоровший
    выпороть¹+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выпоровший
    колоть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: колов
    колоть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: колов
    колоть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: коловши
    колоть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: коловши
    колоть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: коловший
    колоть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: коловший
    колоть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: коловшийся
    колоться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: коловшийся
    уколоть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: уколов
    уколоть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: уколов
    уколоть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: уколовши
    уколоть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: уколовши
    уколоть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: уколовший
    уколоть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: уколовший
    бороться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: боровшись
    бороться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: боровшийся
    побороться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: поборовшись
    побороться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: поборовшийся
    выбить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: выбив
    выбить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: выбив
    выбить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выбивши
    выбить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выбивши
    выбить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выбивший
    выбить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выбивший
    шить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: шив
    шить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: шив
    шить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: шивши
    шить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: шивши
    шить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: шивший
    шить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: шивший
    шить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: шившийся
    зашить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: зашив
    зашить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: зашив
    зашить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: зашивши
    зашить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: зашивши
    зашить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: зашивший
    зашить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: зашивший
    вбить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: вбив
    вбить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: вбив
    вбить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: вбивши
    вбить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: вбивши
    вбить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: вбивший
    вбить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: вбивший
    расшить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: расшив
    расшить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: расшив
    расшить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: расшивши
    расшить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: расшивши
    расшить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: расшивший
    расшить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: расшивший
    пить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: пив
    пить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: пив
    пить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: пивши
    пить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: пивши
    пить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: пивший
    пить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: пивший
    пить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: пившийся
    привить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: привив
    привить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: привив
    привить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: прививши
    привить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: прививши
    привить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прививший
    привить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прививший
    допить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: допив
    допить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: допив
    допить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: допивши
    допить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: допивши
    допить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: допивший
    допить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: допивший
    свить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: свив
    свить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: свив
    свить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: свивши
    свить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: свивши
    свить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: свивший
    свить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: свивший
    распить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: распив
    распить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: распив
    распить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: распивши
    распить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: распивши
    распить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: распивший
    распить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: распивший
    отпить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: отпив
    отпить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: отпив
    отпить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: отпивши
    отпить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: отпивши
    отпить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: отпивший
    отпить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: отпивший
    литься+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: лившись
    лить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: лившийся
    литься+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: лившийся
    налиться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: налившись
    налиться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: налившийся
    облиться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: облившись
    облиться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: облившийся
    биться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: бившись
    бить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: бившийся
    биться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: бившийся
    добиться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: добившись
    добиться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: добившийся
    вымыть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: вымыв
    вымыть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: вымыв
    вымыть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: вымывши
    вымыть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: вымывши
    вымыть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: вымывший
    вымыть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: вымывший
    крыть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: крыв
    крыть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: крыв
    крыть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: крывши
    крыть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: крывши
    крыть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: крывший
    крыть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: крывший
    открыть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: открыв
    открыть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: открыв
    открыть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: открывши
    открыть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: открывши
    открыть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: открывший
    открыть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: открывший
    дуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: дув
    дуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: дув
    дуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: дувши
    дуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: дувши
    дуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: дувший
    дуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: дувший
    надуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: надув
    надуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: надув
    надуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: надувши
    надуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: надувши
    надуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: надувший
    надуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: надувший
    греть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: грев
    греть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: грев
    греть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: гревши
    греть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: гревши
    греть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: гревший
    греть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: гревший
    согреть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: согрев
    согреть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: согрев
    согреть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: согревши
    согреть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: согревши
    согреть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: согревший
    согреть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: согревший
    почить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: почив
    почить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: почив
    почить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: почивши
    почить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: почивши
    почить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: почивший
    почить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: почивший
    брить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: брив
    брить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: брив
    брить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: бривши
    брить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: бривши
    брить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: бривший
    брить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: бривший
    обрить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: обрив
    обрить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: обрив
    обрить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: обривши
    обрить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: обривши
    обрить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: обривший
    обрить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: обривший
    петь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: пев
    петь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: пев
    петь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: певши
    петь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: певши
    петь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: певший
    петь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: певший
    спеть²+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: спев
    спеть¹+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: спев
    спеть¹+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: спев
    спеть²+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: спевши
    спеть¹+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: спевши
    спеть¹+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: спевши
    спеть²+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: спевший
    спеть¹+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: спевший
    спеть¹+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: спевший
    гнить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: гнив
    гнить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: гнивши
    гнить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: гнивший
    сгнить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: сгнив
    сгнить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: сгнивши
    сгнить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: сгнивший
    крыть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: крывшийся
    крыться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: крывшийся
    мыться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: мывшись
    мыть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: мывшийся
    мыться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: мывшийся
    помыться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: помывшись
    помыться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: помывшийся
    давать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: давав
    давать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: давав
    давать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: дававши
    давать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: дававши
    давать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: дававший
    давать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: дававший
    давать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: дававшийся
    даваться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: дававшийся
    надавать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: надавав
    надавать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: надавав
    надавать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: надававши
    надавать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: надававши
    надавать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: надававший
    надавать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: надававший
    оставаться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: остававшись
    оставаться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: остававшийся
    выжать²+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: выжав
    выжать²+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: выжав
    выжать¹+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: выжав
    выжать¹+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: выжав
    выжать²+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выжавши
    выжать²+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выжавши
    выжать¹+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выжавши
    выжать¹+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выжавши
    выжать²+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выжавший
    выжать²+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выжавший
    выжать¹+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выжавший
    выжать¹+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выжавший
    мять+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: мяв
    мять+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: мяв
    мять+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: мявши
    мять+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: мявши
    мять+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: мявший
    мять+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: мявший
    размять+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: размяв
    размять+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: размяв
    размять+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: размявши
    размять+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: размявши
    размять+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: размявший
    размять+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: размявший
    жать²+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: жав
    жать²+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: жав
    жать¹+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: жав
    жать¹+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: жав
    жать²+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: жавши
    жать²+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: жавши
    жать¹+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: жавши
    жать¹+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: жавши
    жать²+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: жавший
    жать²+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: жавший
    жать¹+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: жавший
    жать¹+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: жавший
    нажать²+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: нажав
    нажать²+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: нажав
    нажать¹+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: нажав
    нажать¹+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: нажав
